Arkansas, session 2025, HB1387.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 4-35-204, concerning the board of directors
of a public water authority, is amended to add an additional subsection to
read as follows:
(i)(1)(A) The board of directors of a public water authority shall
post contact information on the websites of the public water authority and
the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission that are available to the public.
(B) As used in subdivision (i)(1)(A) of this section,
"contact information" includes the name and telephone number of the member of
the board of directors of a public water authority.
(2) Any changes to the contact information for a member of the
board of directors of a public water authority shall be updated within ten
(10) business days.

/s/C. Cooper
*ANS144*
02-19-2025 14:12:22 ANS144